Georgia, session 2025_26, HB889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 35 of the Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general provisions
regarding law enforcement officers and agencies, is amended by adding a new Code section
to read as follows:
"35-1-24.
(a) An agent of United States Immigration and the Customs Enforcement and United
States Customs and Border Protection shall, in the performance of his or her duties of
either such agency, be required to:
(1) Wear a name badge, patch, or other clearly visible insignia that identifies the
individual agent; and
(2) Wear a uniform that clearly identifies the agency the to which the agent is affiliated.
H. B. 889
- 1 -

LC 56 0402
(b) Any vehicle operated in the performance of duties by any agent provided for in
subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appropriately marked in a way that clearly
identifies the agency to which any such agent or group of agents is affiliated."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 889
- 2 -